src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct plural negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_IFULL 
!style should include recommendations for marking when predication info is being collapsed
+1+Pl:naan VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET ;
!new tag
!}

!#second person "I-less" plurality {
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_ILESS
+3+Pl:waa  VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY ;
!new tag

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_ILESS_GATEWAY 
    VTA_INDEP_ILESS_PERIPH ;
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ;
!}

!#first or second person singular
!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct singular negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_1_2_SINGULAR_GATEWAY 
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 
    VTA_INDEP_SINGULAR_PERIPH ; 

!#third person number {
!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct plural negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_3
+3+Pl:waa  VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY ;

!fed by VTA_INDEP_NUMBER_GET, direct singular negation
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_3_GATEWAY
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY ; 
    VTA_INDEP_3_PERIPH ;
!}

!probably a good idea to keep a list of the sub-lexicon calls out of a slot

!#####
!#Mode Slot
!#####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY
+Dub:dig    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_GET ;
+Prt:ban   VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_GET ;

!#####
!#Periph Slot
!#####

!#first person pl/inclusive naan {
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_GET
@R.Inverse@ VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_INAN ;
+3+Pl:ig # ; !/ag/->[ig]/naan_
# ; !3rd person singular/obv

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_IFULL_PERIPH_INAN 
+0+Pl:in # ; !/an/->[in]
!}

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_ILESS_PERIPH
+3+Pl:g # ; !/ag/->[g]/VV_
# ; !3rd person singular/obv

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_SINGULAR_PERIPH
+3+Pl:ag # ; !/ag/->[g]/VV_, some other allomorphy here
# ; !3rd person singular/obv
!careful! negation can't be last in word, n inserted then!

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_3_PERIPH
+3+4:an # ; !surely plenty of allomorphy here

!#dubitative {
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_GET
@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_NON_3 ;
@D.Inanimate@@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_3 ;
@D.Inanimate@@R.Inverse@     VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_INV ;!note, allowing ambiguity
@R.Inanimate@               VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_NON_3
+3+Pl:enag # ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_3
+3+4:enan # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_PERIPH_INV
+0+Pl:enan # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_DUB_INAN 
+0+Pl:enan # ;
#;
!}

!#preterit {
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_GET 
@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_NON_3 ;
@D.Inanimate@@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_3 ;
@D.Inanimate@@R.Inverse@     VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_INV ;!note, allowing ambiguity
@R.Inanimate@               VTA_INDEP_PRET_INAN ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_NON_3
+3+Pl:iig # ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_3 
+3+4:iin # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRET_PERIPH_INV 
+0+Pl:iin # ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_PRET_INAN 
+0+Pl:iin # ;
#;
!}

!#####
!#Inanimate Subjects {
!#careful! inverse forms with naan are ambiguous between inan sub and 3 sub!
!#they are not tracked into this area
!#####

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB
+0Sub:n VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SET 
@P.Inanimate.1@ VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_GET ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_GET
@D.Person.1@    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL ;!should pl be specified here?
@R.Negation@@R.Person.3@ VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV_NEG ;
@R.Person.3@    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV ;
                VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SG_OBJ ;

!##Number
LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_SG_OBJ 
0:aa    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;
+0+Pl:an # ;
# ;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV_NEG 
+3+4:ini   #;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_OBV 
!-in here is the marking obv when periph can't ... -an in periph is inan agr!
+3+4:inaa VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL
+3+Pl:aawaa    VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL_GATEWAY;

LEXICON VTA_INDEP_INAN_SUB_ILESS_PL_GATEWAY
+0+Pl:an #;
    VTA_INDEP_MODE_GATEWAY;
#;

!}

!below there be dragons

!this used to be a generic place for transitives to be sorted
!now it is just for non-independent order VTA sorting
LEXICON VTA_NON_INDEP_GET 
# ;
!+VTA+Cnj:0        VTA_CNJ ; !name needs to be followed by morpheme slot
!+VTA+Imp:0       VTA_IMPER ; !name needs to be followed by morpheme slot
!+VTI+Cnj:0        VTI_CNJ ;!name needs to be followed by morpheme slot
!+VTI+Imp:0       VTI_IMPER ;!name needs to be followed by morpheme slot

LEXICON VTI_INDEP !name needs to be followed with a morpheme slot
# ;
